Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

The Convention Center Fund

7-4-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Metropolitan council” means the council of a county having a metropolitan form of government that has a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Metropolitan government” means any county having a metropolitan form of government that has a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Minority-owned business” means a business that is solely owned, or at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the assets or outstanding stock of which is owned, by an individual who personally manages and controls the daily operations of the business and who is impeded from normal entry into the economic mainstream because of:

Past practices of discrimination based on race, religion, ethnic background, or sex;

A disability as defined in § 4-26-102; or

Past practices of racial discrimination against African-Americans;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, social club, fraternal organization, joint stock company, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, business organization, receiver, trustee, syndicate, or any other group or combination acting as a unit; and

“Tax collection official” means the department of finance of the county or municipality, as applicable, or the county clerk, if so designated by ordinance of the legislative body of any municipality having a metropolitan government.

Acts 2007, ch. 422, §§ 4, 7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Local tax for the convention center fund, §67-4-1908.

7-4-202. Additional tax on hotel room or short-term rental unit occupancy.

In addition to any other tax or fee imposed pursuant to this chapter on the occupancy of a hotel room, upon the adoption of an ordinance by the metropolitan council in a county having a metropolitan government, there is authorized an additional privilege tax of up to two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) upon the occupancy of each hotel room within the territory of that metropolitan government. The tax so imposed is a privilege tax upon each occupied room for each night of occupancy and is to be collected and distributed as provided in part 1 of this chapter.

All revenues received by the metropolitan government from the privilege tax imposed pursuant to subsection (a) shall be deposited into a metropolitan government fund entitled “the convention center fund” and shall be used for the purpose of paying costs incurred in modification or construction of a publicly owned convention center in excess of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) in costs located within the territory of the metropolitan government. The revenues may also be used for the operation, promotion, management and marketing of such a convention center. If the revenues from the surcharge or tax in any fiscal year exceed the total of the debt service requirements from that year, the surplus revenue thus accruing shall be retained by the metropolitan government as a reserve fund for future convention center debt service requirements.

In the event that the total bonded indebtedness incurred for the modification or construction of the convention center facility by the metropolitan government is paid in full as to bond principal and interest, including expenses of bond sale or sales, the metropolitan government's taxing resolution imposing taxes authorized by subsection (a) shall be repealed and this tax shall no longer be levied; provided, however, that any funds and interest remaining in the reserve fund after all obligations imposed under this part have been fulfilled shall be used by the governmental board or agency responsible for the operation of the convention center for use by it in the operation, promotion and advertisement of the convention center facilities.

Upon the adoption of an ordinance by the metropolitan council in a county having a metropolitan government, all revenues received by the metropolitan government from the privilege tax imposed pursuant to subsection (a) and that exceed two dollars ($2.00) shall be deposited into a metropolitan government fund entitled the event and marketing fund. For administrative purposes, the event and marketing fund and the committee that approves expenditures shall be attached to a convention and visitors bureau in a county having a metropolitan government or a similar entity approved by the metropolitan council and the metropolitan government mayor. The fund will be governed by a six-person committee and a chair who votes only to break a tie. The committee and the chair shall be appointed by the mayor of the metropolitan government. Members of the committee shall include at least one (1) person nominated by a hotel and lodging association located in the county having a metropolitan government, one (1) person from the hospitality industry, one (1) representative from a hotel corporation that operates a single hotel in a county with a metropolitan government with an excess of two thousand nine hundred (2,900) rooms, two (2) members of the public, one (1) person who owns or operates a business within the central business improvement district, and a chair to be selected by the mayor. Expenditures from the event and marketing fund may be used for any purpose allowable under § 7-4-110(a)(1). All expenditures are subject to the approval of the finance director of the metropolitan government. An audited financial statement shall be supplied annually to the finance director and the council of the metropolitan government.

The authority to charge the amount of the privilege tax imposed on hotel room occupancy by subsection (a) in excess of two dollars ($2.00) and the terms of the committee members shall expire six (6) years from May 21, 2020.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, on or after January 1, 2021, the tax levied pursuant to this section, when levied upon the occupancy of a short-term rental unit secured through a short-term rental unit marketplace, must be collected and remitted in accordance with title 67, chapter 4, part 15.

Acts 2007, ch. 422, § 4; 2008, ch. 1004, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 340, § 1; 2014, ch. 806, § 1; 2019, ch. 426, § 1; 2020, ch. 787, § 4.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “May 21, 2020” for “May 21, 2014” in (d)(2).

The 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 426, § 2. May 21, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 787, § 12. January 1, 2021.

Cross-References. Local tax for the convention center fund, §67-4-1908.

7-4-203. Privilege tax on contracted vehicles leaving public airports.

There is authorized a privilege tax on the privilege of contracted vehicles exiting public airports located within the boundaries of a metropolitan government. The tax shall only be effective upon the adoption of an ordinance by the metropolitan council to impose this privilege tax.

The tax shall be imposed only upon contracted vehicles that charge customers a separate fee for transportation from the airport, unless otherwise excluded in this part.

The tax shall be two dollars ($2.00) each time a contracted vehicle meeting the requirements of subdivision (a)(2) exits the airport while transporting customers from the airport located within the territory of the metropolitan government, but shall exclude noncommercial vehicles and equipment operated by the metropolitan transit authority.

The tax imposed by subsection (a) is a privilege tax upon the contracted vehicle exiting the airport and is to be collected and distributed as provided in this chapter.

The privilege tax is due each time a contracted vehicle to which this section applies leaves the airport. The operator of the contracted vehicle shall be responsible for keeping accurate records to determine the amount of the tax due and payable. That information shall be transmitted daily by the operator of the contracted vehicle to a designated individual within the business organization that hired the operator of the contracted vehicle. The privilege tax shall be remitted to the metropolitan tax collection official by a designated individual within the business organization no later than the twentieth of each month.

All revenues received by the metropolitan government from the privilege tax imposed pursuant to subsection (a) shall be deposited into a metropolitan government fund entitled “the convention center fund” and shall be used for the purpose of paying costs incurred in modification or construction of a publicly owned convention center in excess of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) in costs located within the territory of the metropolitan government. If the revenues from the surcharge or tax in any fiscal year exceeds the total of the debt service requirements from that year, the surplus revenue thus accruing shall be retained by the metropolitan government as a reserve fund for future debt service requirements.

In the event that the total bonded indebtedness incurred for the modification or construction of the convention center facility by the metropolitan government is paid in full as to bond principal and interest, including expenses of bond sale or sales, the metropolitan government’s taxing resolution imposing the taxes authorized pursuant to subsection (a) shall be repealed and the taxes shall no longer be levied; provided, however, that any funds remaining in the reserve fund after all obligations imposed under this part have been fulfilled shall be used by the governmental board or agency responsible for the operation of the convention center for use by it in the promotion and advertisement of the convention center facilities.

Acts 2007, ch. 422, § 4.

Cross-References. Local tax for the convention center fund, §67-4-1908.

7-4-204. Delinquency — Interest and penalties.

Taxes due and payable that are not remitted to the tax collection official on or before the due dates are delinquent.

The person owing the taxes shall be liable for interest on any delinquent taxes from the due date at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum, and, in addition, for a penalty of one percent (1%) for each month or fraction of a month that the taxes are delinquent. The interest and penalties shall become a part of the tax required to be remitted in this chapter.

Willful refusal of a person to collect or remit the tax or willful refusal of an operator of a contracted vehicle to keep accurate records of the tax due and payable is a Class C misdemeanor.

Any fine levied in this chapter shall be applicable to each individual transaction involving an operator of a contracted vehicle for willful refusal to keep accurate records or the willful refusal of a person to collect or remit the tax due and owing.

Acts 2007, ch. 422, § 4.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Local tax for the convention center fund, §67-4-1908.

7-4-205. Wage rates and benefits for workers.

During the construction of a new publicly owned convention center as provided in this part, any contractor entering into a contract with the metropolitan government for the performance of work on the convention center shall pay all workers performing work under those contracts not less than the mean wage for the applicable occupation under the “construction and extraction occupations” published in the Tennessee Occupational Wages Report, as defined in § 12-4-907. In addition, all such contractors shall provide health insurance coverage for all workers performing work under the contracts.

After the construction of the convention center is completed, all persons employed to perform labor or services at the convention center shall be paid a wage that is not less than the mean wage for the applicable occupation under the “construction and extraction occupations” published in the Tennessee Occupational Wages Report, as defined in § 12-4-907. In addition, health insurance coverage shall be provided to all such employees.

Acts 2007, ch. 422, § 4; 2013, ch. 280, §§ 16, 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 280, § 18 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2014.

Cross-References. Local tax for the convention center fund, §67-4-1908.

7-4-206. Minority-owned businesses.

A metropolitan government, in soliciting bids for the construction of a publicly owned convention center in excess of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) in costs located within the territory of that metropolitan government, shall actively solicit bids from minority-owned businesses. The metropolitan government shall strive to maximize participation of minority-owned businesses through both prime and second tier business contracting opportunities.

The metropolitan council shall ensure that the funds that are deposited into the convention center fund created pursuant to this part, are expended in a nondiscriminatory manner.

The metropolitan government shall monitor the expenditure of funds from the convention center fund to ensure that all contractors, vendors, suppliers and professional services providers receiving compensation from the fund do not discriminate in hiring, partnering, contracting or subcontracting on the basis of race, religion, ethnic background, or sex.

The metropolitan government shall monitor the results of minority-owned business participation. The metropolitan government shall periodically investigate to ascertain whether minority-owned business participation is being achieved at a level contemplated pursuant to subsection (a) and shall report information to the comptroller of the treasury in the manner prescribed in subdivision (b)(4).

The metropolitan government shall prepare and submit a quarterly report entitled “the convention center compliance report,” which shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury no later than twenty (20) business days after the end of any calendar quarter in which funds are expended from the convention center fund. The report shall include:

Data on the race, religion, ethnic background and sex of the workforce of each person that receives funds from the convention center fund;

Data on the actual expenditure of funds to minority-owned businesses from the convention center fund; and

Data summarizing the findings of all periodic investigations conducted in accordance with subdivision (b)(3).

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Acts 2007, ch. 422, § 7; 2013, ch. 236, § 66; 2020, ch. 711, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted (b)(5), which read: “The comptroller of the treasury shall, upon receipt of the report from the metropolitan government, transmit a synopsis of the report to the chairs and membership of the state and local government committee of the senate and the local government committee of the house of representatives.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 711, § 11, June 15, 2020.